pl: Konfiguracja przycisku harmonijkowego: Koncertyna angielska 104-przyciskowa; Koncertyna angielska 20-przyciskowa; Koncertyna angielska 30-przyciskowa; 35-przyciskowa koncertyna duetowa; Koncertyna angielska 40-przyciskowa; 46-przyciskowa koncertyna duetowa; Koncertyna angielska 48-przyciskowa; 55-przyciskowa koncertyna duetowa; Koncertyna angielska 56-przyciskowa; Koncertyna angielska 64-przyciskowa; 65-przyciskowa koncertyna duetowa; Koncertyna angielska 72-przyciskowa; Koncertyna angielska 80-przyciskowa; Koncertyna angielska 87-przyciskowa; Pozostałe
nb: Konfigurasjon av konsertinaknapp: Engelsk konsertina med 104 knapper; 20-knappers anglokonsertina; 30-knappers anglokonsertina; 35-knappers duettkonsertina; 40-knappers anglokonsertina; 46-knappers duettkonsertina; Engelsk konsertina med 48 knapper; 55-knappers duettkonsertina; Engelsk konsertina med 56 knapper; Engelsk konsertina med 64 knapper; 65-knappers duettkonsertina; Engelsk konsertina med 72 knapper; Engelsk konsertina med 80 knapper; Engelsk konsertina med 87 knapper; Annen
es: Configuración del botón de la concertina: Concertina inglesa de 104 botones; Concertina anglo de 20 botones; Concertina anglo de 30 botones; Concertina de dúo de 35 botones; Concertina anglo de 40 botones; Concertina de dúo de 46 botones; Concertina inglesa de 48 botones; Concertina de dúo de 55 botones; Concertina inglesa de 56 botones; Concertina inglesa de 64 botones; Concertina de dúo de 65 botones; Concertina inglesa de 72 botones; Concertina inglesa de 80 botones; Concertina inglesa de 87 botones; Otros
ru: Система кнопок на концертине: Английская концертина со 104 кнопками; Концертина Англо с 20 кнопками; Концертина Англо с 30 кнопками; Концертина дуэт с 35 кнопками; Концертина Англо с 40 кнопками; Концертина дуэт с 46 кнопками; Английская концертина с 48 кнопками; Концертина дуэт с 55 кнопками; Английская концертина с 56 кнопками; Английская концертина с 64 кнопками; Концертина дуэт с 65 кнопками; Английская концертина с 72 кнопками; Английская концертина с 80 кнопками; Английская концертина с 87 кнопками; Другое
ja: コンサーティーナのボタン構成: 104ボタンイングリッシュコンサーティーナ; 20ボタンアングロコンサーティーナ; 30ボタンアングロコンサーティーナ; 35ボタンデュエットコンサーティーナ; 40ボタンアングロコンサーティーナ; 46ボタンデュエットコンサーティーナ; 48ボタンイングリッシュコンサーティーナ; 55ボタンデュエットコンサーティーナ; 56ボタンイングリッシュコンサーティーナ; 64ボタンイングリッシュコンサーティーナ; 65ボタンデュエットコンサーティーナ; 72ボタンイングリッシュコンサーティーナ; 80ボタンイングリッシュコンサーティーナ; 87ボタンイングリッシュコンサーティーナ; その他
el: Διαμόρφωση κουμπιού κονσερτίνας: Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 104 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 20 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 30 κουμπιών; Κονσερτίνα duet 35 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 40 κουμπιών; Κονσερτίνα duet 46 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 48 κουμπιών; Κονσερτίνα duet 55 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 56 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 64 κουμπιών; Κονσερτίνα duet 65 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 72 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 80 κουμπιών; Αγγλική κονσερτίνα 87 κουμπιών; Άλλο
sk-SK: Konfigurácia tlačidiel akordeóna: Anglická harmonika so 104 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika s 20 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika s 30 tlačidlami; Duetová harmonika s 35 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika so 40 tlačidlami; Duetová harmonika so 46 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika so 48 tlačidlami; Duetová harmonika s 55 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika s 56 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika so 64 tlačidlami; Duetová harmonika so 65 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika so 72 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika s 80 tlačidlami; Anglická harmonika s 87 tlačidlami; Iné
zh-CN: 手风琴按键配置: 104 键英式手风琴; 20 键英式手风琴; 30 键英式手风琴; 35 键双簧手风琴; 40 键英式手风琴; 46 键双簧手风琴; 48 键英式手风琴; 55 键双簧手风琴; 56 键英式手风琴; 64 键英式手风琴; 65 键双簧手风琴; 72 键英式手风琴; 80 键英式手风琴; 87 键英式手风琴; 其他
vi: Cấu hình nút Concertina: 104- nút điều hòa Tiếng anh; 20-nút điều hòa anglo; 30-nút điều hòa anglo; Bản hòa tấu song ca 35 nút; 40-nút điều hòa anglo; Bản hòa tấu song ca 46 nút; 48-nút điều hòa Tiếng anh; Bản hòa tấu song ca 55 nút; 56-nút điều hòa Tiếng anh; 64-nút điều hòa Tiếng anh; Bản hòa tấu song ca 65 nút; 72-nút điều hòa Tiếng anh; 80-nút điều hòa Tiếng anh; 87-nút điều hòa Tiếng anh; Khác
sv: Knappuppsättning på concertina: Engelsk konsertina med 104 knappar; 20-knapps anglokonsertina; 30-knapps anglokonsertina; 35-knappars duet concertina; 40-knapps anglokonsertina; 46-knappars duet concertina; Engelsk konsertina med 48 knappar; 55-knappars duet concertina; Engelsk konsertina med 56 knappar; Engelsk konsertina med 64 knappar; 65-knappars duet concertina; Engelsk konsertina med 72 knappar; Engelsk konsertina med 80 knappar; Engelsk konsertina med 87 knappar; Annat
hr-HR: Konfiguracija gumba koncertine: Engleska koncertina sa 104 gumba; Anglo koncertina s 20 gumba; Anglo koncertina s 30 gumba; Duet koncertina s 35 gumba; Anglo koncertina s 40 gumba; Duet koncertina s 46 gumba; Engleska koncertina s 48 gumba; Duet koncertina s 55 gumba; Engleska koncertina s 56 gumba; Engleska koncertina sa 64 gumba; Duet koncertina sa 65 gumba; Engleska koncertina sa 72 gumba; Engleska koncertina s 80 gumba; Engleska koncertina s 87 gumba; Ostalo
pt-BR: Configuração do botão da concertina: Concertina inglesa de 104 botões; Concertina anglo de 20 botões; Concertina anglo de 30 botões; Concertina dupla de 35 botões; Concertina anglo de 40 botões; Concertina dupla de 46 botões; Concertina inglesa de 48 botões; Concertina dupla de 55 botões; Concertina inglesa de 56 botões; Concertina inglesa de 64 botões; Concertina dupla de 65 botões; Concertina inglesa de 72 botões; Concertina inglesa de 80 botões; Concertina inglesa de 87 botões; Outro
tr: Akordeon düğme yapılandırması: 104 düğmeli İngiliz akordeon; 20 düğmeli anglo akordeon; 30 düğmeli anglo akordeon; 35 düğmeli düet akordeon; 40 düğmeli anglo akordeon; 46 düğmeli düet akordeon; 48 düğmeli İngiliz akordeon; 55 düğmeli düet akordeon; 56 düğmeli İngiliz akordeon; 64 düğmeli İngiliz akordeon; 65 düğmeli düet akordeon; 72 düğmeli İngiliz akordeon; 80 düğmeli İngiliz akordeon; 87 düğmeli İngiliz akordeon; Diğer
ro-RO: Configurare buton concertină: Concertină anglo cu 104 butoane; Concertină anglo cu 20 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 30 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 35 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 40 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 46 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 48 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 55 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 56 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 64 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 65 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 72 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 80 de butoane; Concertină anglo cu 87 de butoane; Altele
pt-PT: Configuração de botão de concertina: Concertina inglesa de 104 botões; Concertina anglo de 20 botões; Concertina anglo de 30 botões; Concertina dueto de 35 botões; Concertina anglo de 40 botões; Concertina dueto de 46 botões; Concertina inglesa de 48 botões; Concertina dueto de 55 botões; Concertina inglesa de 56 botões; Concertina inglesa de 64 botões; Concertina dueto de 65 botões; Concertina inglesa de 72 botões; Concertina inglesa de 80 botões; Concertina inglesa de 87 botões; Outro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija gumbov za harmoniko concertina: Angleška koncertina s 104 gumbi; Anglo koncertina z 20 gumbi; Anglo koncertina z 30 gumbi; 35-gumbna duetna koncertina; Anglo koncertina s 40 gumbi; 46-gumbna duetna koncertina; Angleška koncertina z 48 gumbi; 55-gumbna duetna koncertina; Angleška koncertina s 56 gumbi; Angleška koncertina s 64 gumbi; 65-gumbna duetna koncertina; Angleška koncertina z 72 gumbi; Angleška koncertina z 80 gumbi; Angleška koncertina s 87 gumbi; Drugo
de: Konfiguration der Ziehharmonika-Taste: Englische Ziehharmonika mit 104 Knöpfen; Anglo-Ziehharmonika mit 20 Knöpfen; Anglo-Ziehharmonika mit 30 Knöpfen; Duett-Ziehharmonika mit 35 Knöpfen; Anglo-Ziehharmonika mit 40 Knöpfen; Duett-Ziehharmonika mit 46 Knöpfen; Englische Ziehharmonika mit 48 Knöpfen; Duett-Ziehharmonika mit 55 Knöpfen; Englische Ziehharmonika mit 56 Knöpfen; Englische Ziehharmonika mit 64 Knöpfen; Duett-Ziehharmonika mit 65 Knöpfen; Englische Ziehharmonika mit 72 Knöpfen; Englische Ziehharmonika mit 80 Knöpfen; Englische Ziehharmonika mit 87 Knöpfen; Sonstiges
fi: Käsiharmonikan konfiguraatio: 104-näppäiminen englantilainen concertina; 20-näppäiminen anglo-concertina; 30-näppäiminen anglo-concertina; 35-näppäiminen duetto-käsiharmonikka; 40-näppäiminen anglo-concertina; 46-näppäiminen duetto-käsiharmonikka; 48-näppäiminen englantilainen concertina; 55-näppäiminen duetto-käsiharmonikka; 56-näppäiminen englantilainen concertina; 64-näppäiminen englantilainen concertina; 65-näppäiminen duetto-käsiharmonikka; 72-näppäiminen englantilainen concertina; 80-näppäiminen englantilainen concertina; 87-näppäiminen englantilainen concertina; Muu
cs: Konfigurace tlačítka koncertiny: Anglická koncertina se 104 tlačítky; Anglická koncertina s 20 tlačítky; Anglická koncertina s 30 tlačítky; 35tlačítková duetová koncertina; Anglická koncertina se 40 tlačítky; 46tlačítková duetová koncertina; Anglická koncertina se 48 tlačítky; 55tlačítková duetová koncertina; Anglická koncertina s 56 tlačítky; Anglická koncertina se 64 tlačítky; 65tlačítková duetová koncertina; Anglická koncertina se 72 tlačítky; Anglická koncertina s 80 tlačítky; Anglická koncertina s 87 tlačítky; Jiné
da: Konfiguration af concertinaknap: Engelsk koncertina med 104 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 20 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 30 knapper; Duetkoncertina med 35 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 40 knapper; Duetkoncertina med 46 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 48 knapper; Duetkoncertina med 55 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 56 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 64 knapper; Duetkoncertina med 65 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 72 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 80 knapper; Engelsk koncertina med 87 knapper; Andet
bg-BG: Конфигурация на бутоните за концертина: Английска концертина със 104 бутона; Английска концертина с 20 бутона; Английска концертина с 30 бутона; Дуетна концертина с 35 бутона; Английска концертина с 40 бутона; Дуетна концертина с 46 бутона; Английска концертина с 48 бутона; Дуетна концертина с 55 бутона; Английска концертина с 56 бутона; Английска концертина с 64 бутона; Дуетна концертина с 65 бутона; Английска концертина със 72 бутона; Английска концертина с 80 бутона; Английска концертина с 87 бутона; Други
hu: A concertina harmonika gombjainak konfigurációja: 104 gombos angol koncertina; 20 gombos angol koncertina; 30 gombos angol koncertina; 35 gombos duett-koncertina; 40 gombos angol koncertina; 46 gombos duett-koncertina; 48 gombos angol koncertina; 55 gombos duett-koncertina; 56 gombos angol koncertina; 64 gombos angol koncertina; 65 gombos duett-koncertina; 72 gombos angol koncertina; 80 gombos angol koncertina; 87 gombos angol concertina; Egyéb
it: Configurazione dei pulsanti della concertina: Concertina inglese a 104 pulsanti; Concertina inglese a 20 pulsanti; Concertina inglese a 30 pulsanti; Concertina per duetto a 35 tasti; Concertina inglese a 40 pulsanti; Concertina per duetto a 46 tasti; Concertina inglese a 48 pulsanti; Concertina per duetto a 55 tasti; Concertina inglese a 56 pulsanti; Concertina inglese a 64 pulsanti; Concertina per duetto a 65 tasti; Concertina inglese a 72 pulsanti; Concertina inglese a 80 pulsanti; Concertina inglese a 87 pulsanti; Altro
nl: Concertina-knopconfiguratie: Engelse concertina met 104 knoppen; Anglo-concertina met 20 knoppen; Engelse concertina met 30 knoppen; Duetconcertina met 35 knoppen; Engelse concertina met 40 knoppen; Duetconcertina met 46 knoppen; Engelse concertina met 48 knoppen; Duetconcertina met 55 knoppen; Engelse concertina met 56 knoppen; Engelse concertina met 64 knoppen; Duetconcertina met 65 knoppen; Engelse concertina met 72 knoppen; Engelse concertina met 80 knoppen; Engelse concertina met 87 knoppen; Andere
lt-LT: Koncertinos mygtukų konfigūracija: 104 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 20 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 30 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 35 mygtukų duetinė koncertina; 40 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 46 mygtukų duetinė koncertina; 48 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 55 mygtukų duetinė koncertina; 56 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 64 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 65 mygtukų duetinė koncertina; 72 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 80 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; 87 mygtukų angliškoji koncertina; Kita
en: Concertina button configuration: 104-button English concertina; 20-button anglo concertina; 30-button anglo concertina; 35-button duet concertina; 40-button anglo concertina; 46-button duet concertina; 48-button English concertina; 55-button duet concertina; 56-button English concertina; 64-button English concertina; 65-button duet concertina; 72-button English concertina; 80-button English concertina; 87-button English concertina; Other
fr: Configuration des boutons de concertina: Accordéon anglais à 104 boutons; Accordéon anglo à 20 boutons; Accordéon anglo à 30 boutons; Concertina double à 35 boutons; Accordéon anglo à 40 boutons; Concertina double à 46 boutons; Accordéon anglais à 48 boutons; Concertina double à 55 boutons; Accordéon anglais à 56 boutons; Accordéon anglais à 64 boutons; Concertina double à 65 boutons; Accordéon anglais à 72 boutons; Accordéon anglais à 80 boutons; Accordéon anglais à 87 boutons; Autre
ko: 콘서티나 버튼 구성: 104버튼 잉글리시 콘서티나; 20버튼 앵글로 콘서티나; 30버튼 앵글로 콘서티나; 35버튼 듀엣 콘서티나; 40버튼 앵글로 콘서티나; 46버튼 듀엣 콘서티나; 48버튼 잉글리시 콘서티나; 55버튼 듀엣 콘서티나; 56버튼 잉글리시 콘서티나; 64버튼 잉글리시 콘서티나; 65버튼 듀엣 콘서티나; 72버튼 잉글리시 콘서티나; 80버튼 잉글리시 콘서티나; 87버튼 잉글리시 콘서티나; 기타
th: รูปร่างภายนอกของปุ่มคอนเซอร์ตินา: หีบเพลงสไตล์อังกฤษแบบ 104 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์แองโกลแบบ 20 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์แองโกลแบบ 30 ปุ่ม; ดูเอ็ตคอนเซอร์ตินา 35 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์แองโกลแบบ 40 ปุ่ม; ดูเอ็ตคอนเซอร์ตินา 46 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์อังกฤษแบบ 48 ปุ่ม; ดูเอ็ตคอนเซอร์ตินา 55 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์อังกฤษแบบ 56 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์อังกฤษแบบ 64 ปุ่ม; ดูเอ็ตคอนเซอร์ตินา 65 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์อังกฤษแบบ 72 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์อังกฤษแบบ 80 ปุ่ม; หีบเพลงสไตล์อังกฤษแบบ 87 ปุ่ม; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 手風琴按鈕配置: 104 鍵英式手風琴; 20 鍵盎格魯式六角手風琴; 30 鍵盎格魯式六角手風琴; 35 鍵二重奏手風琴; 40 鍵盎格魯式六角手風琴; 46 鍵二重奏手風琴; 48 鍵英式手風琴; 55 鍵二重奏手風琴; 56 鍵英式手風琴; 64 鍵英式手風琴; 65 鍵二重奏手風琴; 72 鍵英式手風琴; 80 鍵英式手風琴; 87 鍵英式手風琴; 其他